isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX FH Y 60
SFX FH  se 0 .
SFX FH ti se l .
SFX FH ti se la .
SFX FH ti se lo .
SFX FH ti se li .
SFX FH gti se žu .
SFX FH gti se žim .
SFX FH gti se žiš .
SFX FH gti se ži .
SFX FH gti se žimo .
SFX FH gti se žite .
SFX FH gti se žet .
SFX FH gti se žeh .
SFX FH gti se žeše .
SFX FH gti se žehmo .
SFX FH gti se žeste .
SFX FH gti se žehu .
SFX FH gti se žeči .
SFX FH gti se žeča .
SFX FH gti se žeče .
SFX FH gti se žimy .
SFX FH gti se žimogo .
SFX FH gti se žimomu .
SFX FH gti se žimym .
SFX FH gti se žimom .
SFX FH gti se žimo .
SFX FH gti se žima .
SFX FH gti se žimu .
SFX FH gti se žimoj .
SFX FH gti se žimoju .
SFX FH gti se žimi .
SFX FH gti se žime .
SFX FH gti se žimyh .
SFX FH gti se žimym .
SFX FH gti se žimymi .
SFX FH ti se ši .
SFX FH ti se ša .
SFX FH ti se še .
SFX FH gti se ženy .
SFX FH gti se ženogo .
SFX FH gti se ženomu .
SFX FH gti se ženym .
SFX FH gti se ženom .
SFX FH gti se ženi .
SFX FH gti se žene .
SFX FH gti se ženyh .
SFX FH gti se ženymi .
SFX FH gti se žena .
SFX FH gti se ženu .
SFX FH gti se ženoj .
SFX FH gti se ženoju .
SFX FH gti se ženo .
SFX FH gti se ženje .
SFX FH gti se ženja .
SFX FH gti se ženju .
SFX FH gti se ženjem .
SFX FH gti se ženij .
SFX FH gti se ženjam .
SFX FH gti se ženjami .
SFX FH gti se ženjah .

SFX FI Y 81
SFX FI  se 0 .
SFX FI ti se l .
SFX FI ti se la .
SFX FI ti se lo .
SFX FI ti se li .
SFX FI ti se u .
SFX FI ti se em .
SFX FI ti se eš .
SFX FI ti se e .
SFX FI ti se emo .
SFX FI ti se ete .
SFX FI ti se ut .
SFX FI ti se h .
SFX FI ti se še .
SFX FI ti se hmo .
SFX FI ti se ste .
SFX FI ti se hu .
SFX FI ti se i .
SFX FI ti se imo .
SFX FI ti se ite .
SFX FI ti se uči .
SFX FI ti se učego .
SFX FI ti se učemu .
SFX FI ti se učim .
SFX FI ti se učem .
SFX FI ti se učih .
SFX FI ti se učimi .
SFX FI ti se uča .
SFX FI ti se uču .
SFX FI ti se učej .
SFX FI ti se učeju .
SFX FI ti se uče .
SFX FI ti se emy .
SFX FI ti se emogo .
SFX FI ti se emomu .
SFX FI ti se emym .
SFX FI ti se emom .
SFX FI ti se emo .
SFX FI ti se ema .
SFX FI ti se emu .
SFX FI ti se emoj .
SFX FI ti se emoju .
SFX FI ti se emi .
SFX FI ti se eme .
SFX FI ti se emyh .
SFX FI ti se emym .
SFX FI ti se emymi .
SFX FI ti se vši .
SFX FI ti se všego .
SFX FI ti se všemu .
SFX FI ti se všim .
SFX FI ti se všem .
SFX FI ti se vših .
SFX FI ti se všimi .
SFX FI ti se vša .
SFX FI ti se všu .
SFX FI ti se všej .
SFX FI ti se všeju .
SFX FI ti se vše .
SFX FI ti se eny .
SFX FI ti se enogo .
SFX FI ti se enomu .
SFX FI ti se enym .
SFX FI ti se enom .
SFX FI ti se eni .
SFX FI ti se ene .
SFX FI ti se enyh .
SFX FI ti se enymi .
SFX FI ti se ena .
SFX FI ti se enu .
SFX FI ti se enoj .
SFX FI ti se enoju .
SFX FI ti se eno .
SFX FI ti se enje .
SFX FI ti se enja .
SFX FI ti se enju .
SFX FI ti se enjem .
SFX FI ti se enij .
SFX FI ti se enjam .
SFX FI ti se enjami .
SFX FI ti se enjah .

SFX FJ Y 72
SFX FJ  se 0 .
SFX FJ i se l .
SFX FJ i se la .
SFX FJ i se lo .
SFX FJ i se li .
SFX FJ i se u .
SFX FJ i se em .
SFX FJ i se eš .
SFX FJ i se e .
SFX FJ i se emo .
SFX FJ i se ete .
SFX FJ i se ut .
SFX FJ i se eh .
SFX FJ i se eše .
SFX FJ i se ehmo .
SFX FJ i se este .
SFX FJ i se ehu .
SFX FJ  se mo .
SFX FJ  se te .
SFX FJ i se uči .
SFX FJ i se učego .
SFX FJ i se učemu .
SFX FJ i se učim .
SFX FJ i se učem .
SFX FJ i se učih .
SFX FJ i se učimi .
SFX FJ i se uča .
SFX FJ i se uču .
SFX FJ i se učej .
SFX FJ i se učeju .
SFX FJ i se uče .
SFX FJ i se omy .
SFX FJ i se omogo .
SFX FJ i se omomu .
SFX FJ i se omym .
SFX FJ i se omom .
SFX FJ i se omo .
SFX FJ i se oma .
SFX FJ i se omu .
SFX FJ i se omoj .
SFX FJ i se omoju .
SFX FJ i se omi .
SFX FJ i se ome .
SFX FJ i se omyh .
SFX FJ i se omym .
SFX FJ i se omymi .
SFX FJ i se omo .
SFX FJ i se ši .
SFX FJ i se ša .
SFX FJ i se še .
SFX FJ i se eny .
SFX FJ i se enogo .
SFX FJ i se enomu .
SFX FJ i se enym .
SFX FJ i se enom .
SFX FJ i se eni .
SFX FJ i se ene .
SFX FJ i se enyh .
SFX FJ i se enymi .
SFX FJ i se ena .
SFX FJ i se enu .
SFX FJ i se enoj .
SFX FJ i se enoju .
SFX FJ i se eno .
SFX FJ i se enje .
SFX FJ i se enja .
SFX FJ i se enju .
SFX FJ i se enjem .
SFX FJ i se enij .
SFX FJ i se enjam .
SFX FJ i se enjami .
SFX FJ i se enjah .

SFX FK Y 27
SFX FK y o .
SFX FK y a .
SFX FK y ogo .
SFX FK y u .
SFX FK y oj .
SFX FK y om .
SFX FK y omu .
SFX FK 0 m .
SFX FK y oju .
SFX FK y i .
SFX FK y e .
SFX FK 0 h .
SFX FK 0 mi .
SFX FK gky žši/zz .
SFX FK gky žšego .
SFX FK gky žšemu .
SFX FK gky žšim .
SFX FK gky žšem .
SFX FK gky žše .
SFX FK gky žša .
SFX FK gky žšu .
SFX FK gky žšej .
SFX FK gky žšeju .
SFX FK gky žših .
SFX FK gky žšim .
SFX FK gky žšimi .
SFX FK ky še .

SFX FL Y 71
SFX FL sti dl .
SFX FL sti dla .
SFX FL sti dlo .
SFX FL sti dli .
SFX FL sti m .
SFX FL sti š .
SFX FL sti 0 .
SFX FL sti mo .
SFX FL sti te .
SFX FL sti dut .
SFX FL sti deh .
SFX FL sti deše .
SFX FL sti dehmo .
SFX FL sti deste .
SFX FL sti dehu .
SFX FL sti d .
SFX FL sti dmo .
SFX FL sti dte .
SFX FL sti duči .
SFX FL sti dučego .
SFX FL sti dučemu .
SFX FL sti dučim .
SFX FL sti dučem .
SFX FL sti dučih .
SFX FL sti dučimi .
SFX FL sti duča .
SFX FL sti duču .
SFX FL sti dučej .
SFX FL sti dučeju .
SFX FL sti duče .
SFX FL sti domy .
SFX FL sti domogo .
SFX FL sti domomu .
SFX FL sti domym .
SFX FL sti domom .
SFX FL sti domo .
SFX FL sti doma .
SFX FL sti domu .
SFX FL sti domoj .
SFX FL sti domoju .
SFX FL sti domi .
SFX FL sti dome .
SFX FL sti domyh .
SFX FL sti domym .
SFX FL sti domymi .
SFX FL sti domo .
SFX FL sti dši .
SFX FL sti dša .
SFX FL sti dše .
SFX FL sti deny .
SFX FL sti denogo .
SFX FL sti denomu .
SFX FL sti denym .
SFX FL sti denom .
SFX FL sti deni .
SFX FL sti dene .
SFX FL sti denyh .
SFX FL sti denymi .
SFX FL sti dena .
SFX FL sti denu .
SFX FL sti denoj .
SFX FL sti denoju .
SFX FL sti deno .
SFX FL sti denje .
SFX FL sti denja .
SFX FL sti denju .
SFX FL sti denjem .
SFX FL sti denij .
SFX FL sti denjam .
SFX FL sti denjami .
SFX FL sti denjah .

SFX FM Y 12
SFX FM koli ekoli .
SFX FM koli akoli .
SFX FM koli egokoli .
SFX FM koli ukoli .
SFX FM koli ejkoli .
SFX FM koli emkoli .
SFX FM koli emukoli .
SFX FM koli imkoli .
SFX FM koli ejukoli .
SFX FM koli ikoli .
SFX FM koli ihkoli .
SFX FM koli imikoli .

SFX FN Y 4
SFX FN tokoli egokoli .
SFX FN tokoli emkoli .
SFX FN tokoli emukoli .
SFX FN tokoli imkoli .

SFX FO Y 13
SFX FO ykoli okoli .
SFX FO ykoli akoli .
SFX FO ykoli ogokoli .
SFX FO ykoli ukoli .
SFX FO ykoli ojkoli .
SFX FO ykoli omkoli .
SFX FO ykoli omukoli .
SFX FO koli mkoli .
SFX FO ykoli ojukoli .
SFX FO ykoli ikoli .
SFX FO ykoli ekoli .
SFX FO koli hkoli .
SFX FO koli mikoli .

SFX FP Y 12
SFX FP jže že .
SFX FP ojže aže .
SFX FP jže gože .
SFX FP ojže uže .
SFX FP jže mže .
SFX FP jže muže .
SFX FP ojže ymže .
SFX FP že uže .
SFX FP ojže iže .
SFX FP ojže eže .
SFX FP ojže yhže .
SFX FP ojže ymiže .

SFX FQ Y 4
SFX FQ ka ok .
SFX FQ 0 h .
SFX FQ 0 m .
SFX FQ 0 mi .
