isv_lat_hunspell_dict.dic
sběgti se/FH
skryti se/FI
srasti se/FJ
volgky/FK
jesti/FL
sjesti/FL
čijkoli/FM
čtokoli/FN
kakykoli/FO
ktorykoli/FO
tojže/FP
nosilka/FQ
kojkoli/FM
razběgti se/FH
razrasti se/FJ
razjesti/FL
